California statutes. Public Resources Code
 feedstock inputs, origin of petroleum receipts, imports of finished petroleum products and blendstocks and ethanol, including the source of those imports, exports of finished petroleum products and blendstocks and ethanol, including the destination of those exports and the entity receiving those exports, refinery outputs, refinery stocks, finished product supply and distribution, including all gasoline sold unbranded by the refiner, blender, or importer, and all current inventories of refined and unrefined petroleum products.

(2) Major marketers shall report, by volume, price, and type, on petroleum product receipts and the sources of these receipts, inventories of finished petroleum products and blendstocks and ethanol, distributions through branded and unbranded distribution networks, and exports of finished petroleum products and blendstocks
 and ethanol from the state.

(b) Each major oil producer, refiner, marketer, oil transporter, oil storer, pipeline operator, or port through which refined gasoline is imported or exported, shall annually submit information to the commission in such form and extent as the commission prescribes pursuant to this section. The information shall be submitted within 30 days after the end of each reporting period, and shall include the following:

(1) Major oil transporters shall report on petroleum by reporting the capacities of each major transportation system, the amount transported by each system, and inventories thereof. The commission may prescribe rules and regulations that exclude pipeline and transportation modes operated entirely on property owned by major oil transporters
 from the reporting requirements of this section if the data or information is not needed to fulfill the purposes of this chapter. The provision of the information shall not be construed to increase or decrease any authority the Public Utilities Commission may otherwise have.

(2) Major oil storers shall report on storage capacity, inventories, receipts and distributions, and methods of transportation of receipts and distributions.

(3) Major oil producers shall, with respect to thermally enhanced oil recovery operations, report annually by designated oil field, the monthly use, as fuel, of crude oil and natural gas.

(4) Refiners shall report on facility capacity, and utilization and method of transportation of refinery receipts
 and distributions.

(5) Major oil marketers shall report on facility capacity and methods of transportation of receipts and distributions.

(6) Pipeline operators and port operators shall report their capacities for all pipelines and ports used to transport refined gasoline.

(7) All major oil producers, refiners, marketers, oil transporters, oil storers, pipeline operators, or port operators submitting information under this subdivision shall include in the report for each reporting period the full names of all persons or entities that directly or indirectly own 10 percent or more of the major oil producer, refiner, marketer, oil transporter, oil storer, pipeline operator, or port operator submitting the information.

(c) Each person required to report pursuant to subdivision (a) shall submit a projection each month of the information to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) for the quarter following the month in which the information is submitted to the commission.

(d) In addition to the data required under subdivision (a), each integrated oil refiner that produces, refines, transports, and markets in interstate commerce and that supplies more than 500 branded retail outlets in California shall submit to the commission an annual industry forecast for Petroleum Administration for Defense, District V, covering Alaska, Arizona,
 California, Hawaii,
 Nevada, Oregon, and Washington. The forecast shall include the information to be submitted under subdivision (a), and shall be submitted by March 15 of each year. The commission may require California-specific forecasts only if the commission finds them necessary to carry out its responsibilities.

(e) The commission may by order or regulation modify the reporting period as to any individual item of information setting forth in the order or regulation its reason for so doing.

(f) (1) Destination facilities shall submit to the
 commission, by deadlines set by the commission, the following information regarding crude oil transported to or within California via rail car or marine vessel:

(A) The route of transport within California.

(B) The marketable crude oil name.

(C) The loading facility, including the loading facility name, and the latitude, longitude, and state where the facility is located.

(D) The name of the destination facility, the type of facility, and the latitude and longitude where the facility is located.

(E) Whether the crude oil is nonfloating oil, as defined in Section 8670.3 of the Government Code.

(2) The commission shall quarterly prepare and make available to the public a report based on the data collected pursuant to paragraph (1) that shall include, at a minimum, the routes of transport of crude oil within California, the types of crude oil transported over each of those routes, and the frequency with which nonfloating oil has been transported over each of those routes during the reporting period. The commission shall aggregate information used in a report prepared under this paragraph to the extent necessary to assure confidentiality if public disclosure of the specific information or data would result in unfair competitive disadvantage to the person supplying the information or would adversely affect market competition.

(3) The commission may require additional
 information to be submitted as necessary to perform its responsibilities under this chapter.

(g) Any person required to submit information or data under this chapter, in lieu thereof, may submit a report made to any other governmental agency, if:

(1) The alternate report or reports contain all of the information or data required by this chapter.

(2) The person clearly identifies the specific provision of this chapter to which the alternate report is responsive.

(h) Each refiner shall submit to the commission, within 30 days after the end of each monthly reporting period, all of the following information in such form and extent as the commission
 prescribes:

(1) Monthly California weighted average prices and sales volumes of finished leaded regular, unleaded regular, and premium motor gasoline sold through company-operated retail outlets, to other end-users, and to wholesale customers.

(2) Monthly California weighted average prices and sales volumes for residential sales, commercial and institutional sales, industrial sales, sales through company-operated retail outlets, sales to other end-users, and wholesale sales of No. 2 diesel fuel, No. 2 fuel oil, and any renewable fuels.

(3) Monthly California weighted average prices and sales volumes for retail sales and wholesale sales of No. 1 distillate, kerosene, finished aviation gasoline, kerosene-type jet fuel, No. 4 fuel
 oil, residual fuel oil with 1 percent or less sulfur, residual fuel oil with greater than 1 percent sulfur, and consumer grade propane.

(i) (1) Beginning the first week after January 1, 2004, and each week thereafter, an oil refiner, oil producer, petroleum product transporter, petroleum product marketer, petroleum product pipeline operator, and terminal operator, as designated by the commission, shall submit a report in the form and extent as the commission prescribes pursuant to this section. The commission may determine the form and extent necessary by order or by regulation.

(2) A report may include any of the following information:

(A) Receipts and inventory levels of crude oil and petroleum products
 at each refinery and terminal location.

(B) Amount of gasoline, diesel, jet fuel, blending components, and other petroleum products imported and exported.

(C) Amount of gasoline, diesel, jet fuel, blending components, and other petroleum products transported intrastate by marine vessel.

(D) Amount of crude oil imported, including information identifying the source of the crude oil.

(E) The regional average of invoiced retailer buying price. This subparagraph does not either preclude or augment the current authority of the commission to collect additional data under
 paragraph (3) of subdivision (f).

(F) Copies of all contracts or agreements entered into, or amendments to contracts or agreements, with other oil refiners, oil producers, petroleum product transporters, petroleum product marketers, petroleum product pipeline operators, terminal operators, or any other entity that trades in petroleum products whether or not those entities take possession of petroleum products, as designated by the commission, during the monthly reporting period, along with records of every transaction made under those contracts or agreements and the prices charged for those transactions.

(3) This subdivision is intended to clarify the commission’s existing authority under subdivision (f) to collect specific information. This subdivision neither
 precludes nor augments the existing authority of the commission to collect information.

(j) All importers of refined products and renewable fuels via marine vessel shall report to the commission, at least 96 hours before the arrival of a marine vessel delivery to California, all of the following information:

(1) The name of the product tanker or name of the barge, including associated tug name.

(2) The loading location or locations for cargo.

(3) The volume by each type of transportation fuel, such as gasoline, gasoline blending components, diesel fuel, renewable diesel fuel, jet fuel, sustainable aviation fuel, biodiesel, and ethanol.

(4) The cargo landed cost, including the cost incurred to purchase, load, transport, and all other costs and fees to deliver, each type of transportation fuel, such as gasoline, gasoline blending components, diesel fuel, renewable diesel fuel, jet fuel, sustainable aviation fuel, biodiesel, and ethanol.

(5) The status of any transportation fuel as sold before discharge, the identity of the buyer for any presold product, and the sale price of any presold product.

(6) The planned discharge location, such as the marine berth designation, or locations.

(7) The foreign, domestic, and intrastate marine movements of the vessel from the port of origin to the port of
 delivery of the cargo.

(k) Nonrefiners, such as proprietary storage companies, that commercially trade in gasoline, gasoline blending components, diesel fuel, or renewable diesel fuel inventory not subject to contractual supply obligations, shall submit weekly reports to the commission, starting 30 days after the effective date of the act adding this subdivision, that include the weekly inventory volume, by type, such as gasoline, gasoline blending components, diesel fuel, or renewable fuels, for each position holder by name of company, and copies of all contracts or agreements entered into with any refiners, oil producers, petroleum product transporters, petroleum product marketers, petroleum product pipeline operators, terminal operators, or any other entity that trades in petroleum products whether or not those entities take
 possession of those products, as designated by the commission.

(l) Refiners and nonrefiners that consummate spot market transactions shall submit a daily report to the commission, starting 30 days after the effective date of the act adding this subdivision, that includes all of the following information for each transaction occurring during the preceding day:

(1) The identity of the spot market where the transaction occurred.

(2) Whether the transaction was reported to the Oil Price Information Service (OPIS), or any other price reporting service, and the time of the reporting.

(3) The date of the transaction.

(4) The time of the transaction.

(5) The contract identification number for the transaction.

(6) The position sequence number for the transaction.

(7) The contract position identification number for the transaction.

(8) The name, or nonanonymized identification of the executing trader for the transaction.

(9) The counterparty for the transaction, including company name and name or nonanonymized identification of the executing trader.

(10) Whether the reporting entity is the seller
 or buyer.

(11) The broker, including company name and name or nonanonymized identification of the executing broker.

(12) The type of refined transportation fuel, such as gasoline, diesel, or jet fuel.

(13) The product name for each type of refined transportation fuel.

(14) The volume of each transaction in thousands of barrels, or specified unit of measurement if unable to be indicated in thousands of barrels.

(15) The invoiced volume of each transaction in thousands of barrels, or specified unit of measurement if unable to be indicated in thousands of barrels.

(16) The time and date the material that is the subject of the transaction is scheduled to be delivered or was delivered.

(17) The delivery location specified in the contract for the transaction and the actual delivery location.

(18) The method of transportation for the delivery, such as pipeline, marine vessel, or truck, and the name of the transport.

(19) The actual title transfer date.

(20) The contract subcycle, including descriptors such as “Any,” “L3,” “FH,” “BH,” “C1,” “C2,” “C3,” or “C4.”

(21) The type of pricing method, including exchange of
 futures for physical (EFP), fixed price, fixed date range, floating date range, reference formula, OPIS close, event-related date range, such as three days on and around delivery or discharge, or any other utilized method of pricing.

(22) The contract price formula, including the differential from any contract formula and the unit of measurement for any price differential.

(23) The pricing start and end dates for each contract.

(24) The price value of the contract.

(25) For EFP contracts, the name of the futures product, the contract month of the futures product expressed as the two-digit month and the two-digit year (MM-YY), and the price value of the
 futures product.

(m) It is the intent of the Legislature that all refiners shall, while protecting the health and safety of the public and employees, schedule planned maintenance and turnaround in a manner that ensures minimum levels of transportation fuels in production or
 reserves necessary to prevent supply shortages or price spikes. To advance that purpose, refiners shall report maintenance activities for each refinery to the commission as follows:

(1) Notwithstanding any other law, a refiner shall notify the executive director of the commission of all plans to undertake turnaround and planned maintenance. A refiner’s notification shall include, at a minimum, all of the following information:

(A) A brief description of planned work.

(B) The scheduled start date.

(C) The scheduled return-to-service date.

(D) The individual process units involved.

(E) The name and operational capacity of each process unit.

(F) The estimated daily decrease in output of material or substance produced by the unit, such as gasoline, diesel, or jet fuel components.

(G) The projected quantity of contractual supply obligations for finished gasoline due during the planned maintenance event or turnaround.

(H) The drawdown of inventory levels of gasoline and gasoline blending components and other material or substance produced by the unit that are controlled by the refiner at the refinery and at other storage locations in California during the planned maintenance event or turnaround, the current levels of such inventories at the
 time notice is provided, and the anticipant levels of such inventories immediately before the commencement of the planned maintenance event or turnaround.

(I) Imports of gasoline and gasoline blend components and other material or substance produced by the unit in preparation for or during the planned maintenance event.

(J) Planned purchases of gasoline and gasoline blending components and other material or substance produced by the unit from other market participants in California related to the planned maintenance event.

(K) Planned reductions of noncontracted sales of gasoline or other material or substance produced by the unit related to the planned maintenance event.

(2) The refiner’s notification shall be submitted to the executive director of the commission at least 120 days before the planned maintenance or turnaround.

(3) Before submitting its turnaround schedule notification to the Division of Occupational Safety and Health pursuant to Section 7872 of the Labor Code, each refiner shall submit its turnaround schedule to the executive director of the commission. When submitting its schedule to the division, each refiner shall indicate that, for each scheduled turnaround, the notification to the commission was submitted.

(4) For unplanned maintenance resulting in a shutdown of a refinery process of greater than 24 hours, submit initial and final reports as follows:

(A) The initial report, due within 48 hours of the initial outage, shall include all of the following information:

(i) The name and operational capacity of each process unit involved in the unplanned outage.

(ii) The initial estimated daily decrease in output of gasoline, diesel, and jet fuel components from each process unit affected by the unplanned outage.

(iii) The current inventory levels of the material or substance produced by the unit affected by the unplanned outage that are controlled by the refiner at the refinery and at other storage locations in California during the unplanned maintenance event.

(iv) A description of the reason for the unplanned
 maintenance or outage.

(v) The projected duration of production reduction.

(B) The final report, due within 48 hours of the completion of repairs, shall include all of the following information:

(i) The return-to-service date.

(ii) The total decreased output of gasoline, diesel, and jet fuel components from each of the affected process units.

(iii) The total increased output from other process units by type of refined product to partially compensate for the reduced output from the process units affected by the unplanned outage.

(iv) The
 amount of material obtained from other sources that compensated for the decrease described in clause (ii) and enabled the refiner to cover for the loss of that production.

(v) The drawdown of inventory levels of any material or substance produced by the unit that are controlled by the refiner at the refinery and at other storage locations in California during the unplanned maintenance event.

(5) Upon receipt of a notification under this subdivision, the
 executive director of the commission shall review the notification and may request any additional information from the refiner that is necessary for the commission to assess the potential effect of the planned maintenance event on the supply and prices of transportation fuels in the state.

(n) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, information in the notification provided to the commission by a refiner providing a notice or report of its planned maintenance, unplanned maintenance, or turnaround schedule, including notifications under subdivision (m) shall be considered confidential information not subject to public disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code). The commission may share the information with other state
 agencies, including the Attorney General, only if the other state agency agrees to maintain the confidentiality of the information.

(2) The commission may adopt guidelines to prescribe the manner in which the executive director of the commission shall implement subdivision (m) at a commission business meeting. The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) does not apply to any regulations, guidelines, or other standards adopted by the commission pursuant to this paragraph.

(o) Refiners shall report annually to the commission their planned production levels and schedule for turnarounds and planned maintenance for the following 12 months, by month and by finished product.

(p) (1) The operator of any refinery in this state shall report to the commission at least 12 months in advance if that refinery operator intends to permanently shut down, shut down to reconfigure, or sell a refinery in a transaction that may result in a refinery shutting down or reconfiguring.

(2) Upon receipt of a notice pursuant to paragraph (1), the commission shall notify the Legislature in a manner that does not disclose confidential information, if applicable.

(3) After the completion of the report by the commission required
 by Section 25371 and its submission to the Legislature, the commission may modify the notice required under this subdivision. The commission shall not reduce the notice period to less than 12 months.

(q) (1) (A) For purposes of this subdivision,

 “reportable pipeline” means a pipeline that delivers crude oil to
 one or more crude oil refineries in California for processing into transportation fuels, except as specified in subparagraph (B).

(B) “Reportable pipeline” does not include a pipeline whose closure would not cause a significant reduction, as defined pursuant to paragraph
 (4), in the quantity of crude oil that one or more crude oil refineries in California receive for processing.

(2) Commencing March 30, 2027, and each month thereafter, the operator of a reportable pipeline shall
 submit the following information about the pipeline to the commission within 30 days after the end of each monthly reporting period: 

(A) Minimum operating volume of the pipeline in a 24-hour period necessary to ensure safe operations for crude oil transport and a description of relevant operational constraints. 

(B) Maximum operating volume of the pipeline in a 24-hour period possible while ensuring safe operations for crude oil transport. 

(C) Volume of crude oil delivered each
 day. 

(D) Number of hours in operation each day. 

(E) Maximum nameplate capacity. 

(F) Maximum available capacity.

(3) The commission shall work with stakeholders, including, but not limited to,
 refiners and pipeline operators, to identify, on or before December 31, 2026, those pipelines that meet the definition of a reportable pipeline.

(4) The commission shall, for purposes of this subdivision, define what constitutes a significant reduction in the quantity of the crude oil
 that one or more refineries receive for processing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 657, Sec. 1.   (SB 767)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

25354.2.

(a) The commission, in consultation with the Labor and Workforce Development Agency and labor and industry stakeholders, shall consider ways to manage necessary refinery turnarounds and maintenance that would protect the health and safety of employees, local communities, and the public, and minimize the impact of maintenance-related production losses on fuel prices. The commission may, by regulation, impose requirements governing the timing of turnaround and maintenance developed through consultations under this
 section.

(b) Regulations adopted under this section shall do, but not be limited to, both of the following:

(1) Protect the health and safety of
 employees, local communities, and the public.

(2) Include criteria that are required to be met before a refinery commences a turnaround or maintenance event, including, but not limited to, demonstrating to the satisfaction of the executive director of the commission, through a report required by subdivision (m) of Section 25354, that the refiner has made resupply plans or other arrangements sufficient to ensure that the loss of production during the turnaround or maintenance event does not adversely affect the California transportation fuels market.

(c) This section does not modify any requirements of, or standards issued pursuant to, Section 6311 of, or Part 7.5 (commencing with Section 7850) of Division 5 of, the Labor Code, including the authority of employees to perform an emergency shutdown of the refinery and necessary maintenance work for safety.

(d) A regulation adopted, or action taken, pursuant to this section shall not excuse an employer’s compliance with the skilled and trained workforce and wage requirements set forth in Section 25536.7 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   (AB 1 2x)   Effective January 13, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25354.4.

(a) The commission, in consultation with the Independent Consumer Fuels Advisory Committee established pursuant to Section 25373, shall consider the effects of refiners’ inventories of fuel and feedstocks and blending components on the price of transportation fuels in California. The commission may, by regulation, develop and impose requirements for refiners operating in the state to maintain minimum levels of inventories of refined transportation fuels meeting California specifications, including any feedstocks and blending components for those fuels.

(b) Regulations adopted under this section shall
 protect the health and safety of employees, local communities, and the public, and shall provide for all of the following:

(1) A process for establishing minimum inventory levels specified for each refiner or each refining region, and for each fuel or blending component type.

(2) A process for maximizing the use of existing storage infrastructure.

(3) A process for waiving, if appropriate, minimum inventory requirements for a small refinery, as defined in Section 80.2 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as that section read on the effective date of the bill that added this section, if the refiner of the small refinery demonstrates that those requirements would impose a disproportionate economic hardship.

(4) A process for adjusting, if appropriate,
 minimum inventory requirements for one or more refiners based on region, season, refinery size and storage capacity, and changes in regional or statewide supply and demand for refined transportation fuels meeting California specifications.

(5) Market conditions under which a refiner would be permitted or required to draw down its inventories below an established level and requirements for the rebuilding of those drawn-down inventories, including a metric or threshold based on market conditions that would automatically require a refiner to draw down inventories and provide that fuel to the market.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the commission shall not adopt a regulation pursuant to this section unless it finds that the likely benefits to consumers from avoiding
 price volatility outweigh the potential costs to consumers. In making that determination, the commission shall consider all of the following factors, but no single factor shall be determinative:

(1) Whether it is likely that the minimum levels of inventories of refined transportation fuels will lead to greater supply in the California transportation fuels market than would exist without the minimum levels of inventories.

(2) Whether it is likely that the minimum levels of inventories of refined transportation fuels will lead to lower average retail prices on an annual basis than would exist without the minimum levels of inventories, and whether it is likely that the minimum levels of inventories will reduce the severity of retail price volatility.

(3) Whether easing of supply chain inefficiencies or constraints would lead to greater supply in the California transportation fuels market than requirements to establish minimum levels of inventories of refined transportation fuels.

(4) Whether it is likely that supply gains achieved through the adoption of the minimum levels of inventories of refined transportation fuels will be offset by actions of market participants not subject to these regulations and thereby have the effect of reducing supply in the market.

(d) (1) A regulation adopted under this section shall not modify any requirements of, or standards issued pursuant to, Section 6311
 of, or Part 7.5 (commencing with Section 7850) of Division 5 of, the Labor Code, including the authority of employees to perform an emergency shutdown of the refinery and necessary maintenance work for safety.

(2) A regulation adopted, or action taken, pursuant to this section shall not excuse an employer’s compliance with the skilled and trained workforce and wage requirements set forth in Section 25536.7 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) In developing or amending regulations adopted under this section, the commission may consider
 the use of a compliance mechanism for each refiner that is tradable between or within each refining region for refiners to meet the minimum inventory requirements adopted pursuant to this section.

(f) The commission shall not apply a minimum inventory requirement under this section to a refiner in a manner that would be met only by the construction of additional storage infrastructure, as determined by the commission.

(g) One year after the adoption of any regulation pursuant to this section, and each year thereafter in which a regulation pursuant to this section is in effect, the commission shall submit a report to the Legislature, in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, that includes a reevaluation of the effectiveness of that regulation, including whether the regulation continues to meet the cost effectiveness test described in subdivision (c), and shall provide an update on the factors identified in subdivision (c) regarding the implemented regulation.

(h) For purposes of this section, “refining region” means the two in-state regions of concentrated refineries, where the preponderance of refining capacity is located in the San Francisco Bay area and the Los Angeles area.

(i) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2033, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 2.   (AB 1 2x)   Effective January 13, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

25354.6.

(a) The commission shall notify a refiner or person who fails to comply with the requirements of Section 25354.2 or 25354.4, or fails to comply with the regulations adopted under those sections. If, within three days after being initially notified of the failure to comply, the refiner or person continues or persists in its noncompliance, the refiner or person shall be subject to an administrative civil penalty of not less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), and not more than one million dollars ($1,000,000), per day for each day that the noncompliance occurs or persists.

(b) The executive director of the commission shall issue and serve a complaint
 on the refiner or person, and the commission shall hold a hearing, adopt a decision, and require payment of the penalty in accordance with the procedures described in Section 25534.1, with the penalty to be assessed based on each day of noncompliance following the third day after the initial notification by the commission.

(c) Judicial review and enforcement of an order imposing an administrative civil penalty under this section may be had in accordance with the procedures described in Section 25534.2.

(d) The commission may seek any form of injunctive or remedial relief from a court of competent jurisdiction to enforce compliance with Sections 25354.2 and 25354.4, and regulations adopted under those sections.

(e) This
 section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2033, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 3.   (AB 1 2x)   Effective January 13, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 4 of Stats. 2024, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

25354.6.

(a) The commission shall notify a refiner or person who fails to comply with the requirements of Section 25354.2, or fails to comply with the regulations adopted under that section. If, within three days after being initially notified of the failure to comply, the refiner or person continues or persists in its noncompliance, the refiner or person shall be subject to an administrative civil penalty of not less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), and not more than one million dollars ($1,000,000), per day for each day that the noncompliance occurs or persists.

(b) The executive director of the commission shall issue and serve a complaint on the refiner
 or person, and the commission shall hold a hearing, adopt a decision, and require payment of the penalty in accordance with the procedures described in Section 25534.1, with the penalty to be assessed based on each day of noncompliance following the third day after the initial notification by the commission.

(c) Judicial review and enforcement of an order imposing an administrative civil penalty under this section may be had in accordance with the procedures described in Section 25534.2.

(d) The commission may seek any form of injunctive or remedial relief from a court of competent jurisdiction to enforce compliance with Section 25354.2, and regulations adopted under that section.

(e) This section shall become operative on
 January 1, 2033.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2024, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 4.   (AB 1 2x)   Effective January 13, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2033, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

25355.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Gross gasoline refining margin” means the difference, expressed in dollars per barrel, between the volume-weighted average price of wholesale gasoline sold by a refiner in the state and the average price of crude oil received by the refinery.

(2) “Net gasoline refining margin” means the gross gasoline refining margin minus the refinery’s operational costs.

(3) “Operational costs” means costs, expressed in dollars per barrel, necessarily incurred by the operator of a refinery in the state to produce gasoline meeting California specifications, including, but not limited
 to, costs of labor, electricity, natural gas, chemicals, maintenance, hydrogen, and other intermediate oil products, federal renewable identification numbers, obligation costs, capital investments, logistics costs, and additive costs.

(b) Within 30 days of the end of each calendar month, the operator of each refinery operating in the state that produces gasoline meeting California specifications shall submit to the commission a report for the refinery containing all of the following information:

(1) The volume, in barrels, of crude oil received in that month, separated into domestic and foreign subtotals.

(2) The volume-weighted average crude oil acquisition cost paid for crude oil that is received and intended to be refined during that month, separated into domestic and foreign crude oil acquisition costs.

(3) The volume in barrels of refined gasoline received or imported in that month from entities other than the refiner.

(4) The volume-weighted average cost of any refined gasoline received or imported by a refiner during that month.

(5) The quantity, in barrels, of wholesale gasoline meeting California specifications sold and the corresponding volume-weighted average prices, less all applicable local, state, and federal taxes, separated by unbranded rack sales, branded rack sales, bulk sales, spot pipeline sales, and dealer tankwagon (DTW) sales in that month.

(6) Separate quantification of the volume-weighted fees or estimated valuations of costs embedded in all wholesale gasoline sales associated with the low-carbon fuel standard (LCFS) and associated
 with the cap and trade cap-at-the-rack (CAR) program, for each volume-weighted average price for: (A) unbranded rack sales, (B) branded rack sales, (C) bulk sales, (D) spot pipeline sales, and (E) DTW sales, in that month.

(7) The gross gasoline refining margin per barrel of gasoline sold in that month.

(8) The operational costs per barrel of gasoline sold in that month, including a complete description and amount of each category of cost identified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) and any other category of cost.

(9) The net gasoline refining margin per barrel of gasoline sold in that month.

(c) Within 45 days of the end of each calendar month, the commission shall post on its internet website all of the following:

(1) The gross gasoline refining margin data reported pursuant to this section for that month, and any gross gasoline refining margin independently calculated by the commission, as a volume-weighted gross refining margin in aggregate for all the combined refineries in the state.

(2) The gross gasoline refining margin data reported for that month, and any gross gasoline refining margin independently calculated by the commission, in aggregate for each refiner with more than one refinery operating within California.

(3) The net gasoline refining margin data reported pursuant to this section for that month, and any net gasoline refining margin independently calculated by the commission, as a volume-weighted net refining margin in aggregate for all the combined refineries in the state.

(4) The net gasoline refining margin data reported for that month, and any net gasoline refining margin independently calculated by the commission, in aggregate for each refiner with more than one refinery operating within the state.

(5) The aggregated data submitted pursuant to paragraphs (1) through (4), inclusive, of subdivision (b) for that month.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 4.   (SB 2 1x)   Effective June 26, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25355.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Gross gasoline refining margin excluding state program costs” means the amount, expressed in dollars per barrel and calculated by the commission on a monthly basis, equal to the volume-weighted average rack price of wholesale gasoline sold by a refiner in the state, less the volume-weighted fees or estimated valuations of costs embedded in all of the refiner’s wholesale gasoline sales associated with the low carbon fuel standard and the cap and trade cap-at-the-rack program, less the refiner’s volume-weighted average acquisition cost.

(2) “Maximum gross gasoline refining margin” means the maximum amount of
 gross gasoline refining margin excluding state program costs established under subdivision (b).

(3) “Volume-weighted average acquisition cost” means the combined volume-weighted average of the refiner’s volume-weighted average crude oil acquisition cost and the refiner’s volume-weighted cost of acquiring refined gasoline imported to California or received from an entity other than the refiner.

(4) “Volume-weighted average rack price of wholesale gasoline” means the combined volume-weighted average of the refiner’s rack price of the branded and unbranded rack sales reported under paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 25355.

(5) “Volume-weighted average crude oil acquisition cost” means the amount reported as required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 25355.

(b) The commission may, by regulation or order at a business meeting, subject to the requirements of subdivision (f), set a maximum gross gasoline refining margin.
